Illinois, session 104th, SB48.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Foreign Countries of Concern Act. 6    Section 5. Contracting with entities of foreign countries 7of concern prohibited.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Controlling interest" means possession of the power to 10direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of 11a company, whether through ownership of securities, by 12contract, or otherwise. A person or entity that directly or 13indirectly has the right to vote 25% or more of the voting 14interests of the company or is entitled to 25% or more of the 15company's profits is presumed to possess a controlling 16interest.17    "Department" means the Department of Central Management 18Services.19    "Foreign country of concern" means the People's Republic 20of China, the Russian Federation, the Islamic Republic of 21Iran, the Democratic People's Republic of Korea, the Republic 22of Cuba, Venezuela, or the Syrian Arab Republic, including any 23agency of or any other entity of significant control of such   SB0048- 2 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1foreign country of concern.2    "Governmental entity" means any legislative, executive, 3administrative, or advisory body of the State, any State 4university or college, any county, township, city, village, 5incorporated town, or school district, and any other municipal 6corporation, board, bureau, committee, or commission of the 7State.8    (b) Beginning on the effective date of this Act, a 9governmental entity may not knowingly enter into a contract 10with an entity that would give the entity access to an 11individual's personal identifying information if:12        (1) the entity is owned by the government of a foreign 13    country of concern;14        (2) the government of a foreign country of concern has 15    a controlling interest in the entity; or16        (3) the entity is organized under the laws of or has 17    its principal place of business in a foreign country of 18    concern.19    (c) Beginning on the effective date of this Act, a 20governmental entity may not extend or renew a contract with an 21entity listed in subsection (b) if the contract would give 22that entity access to an individual's personal identifying 23information.24    (d) Beginning on the effective date of this Act, a 25governmental entity may not accept a bid on a contract, accept 26a proposal for a contract, or enter into a contract with an   SB0048- 3 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1entity if that contract would grant the entity access to an 2individual's personal identifying information unless the 3entity provides the governmental entity with an affidavit 4signed by an officer or representative of the entity under 5penalty of perjury attesting that the entity does not meet any 6of the criteria in subsection (b).7    If an entity extends or renews a contract with a 8governmental entity that would grant the entity access to an 9individual's personal identifying information, then the entity 10must provide the governmental entity with an affidavit signed 11by an officer or representative of the entity under penalty of 12perjury attesting that the entity does not meet any of the 13criteria in subsection (b).14    (e) The Attorney General may bring a civil action in any 15court of competent jurisdiction against an entity that 16violates this Section. Violations of this Section may result 17in:18        (1) a civil penalty equal to twice the amount of the 19    subject contract;20        (2) ineligibility to enter into, renew, or extend any 21    contract, including any grant agreements, with any 22    governmental entity for up to 5 years; and23        (3) ineligibility to receive or renew any license, 24    certification, or credential issued by a governmental 25    entity for up to 5 years.26    (f) Any penalties collected under subsection (e) must be   SB0048- 4 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1deposited into the General Revenue Fund.2    (g) The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 3Section, including rules establishing the form for the 4affidavit required under subsection (d). 5    Section 10. Economic incentives to foreign countries of 6concern prohibited.7    (a) As used in this Section:8    "Controlled by" means having possession of the power to 9direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of 10a company, whether through ownership of securities, by 11contract, or otherwise. A person or entity that directly or 12indirectly has the right to vote 25% or more of the voting 13interests of the company or that is entitled to 25% or more of 14the company's profits is presumed to control the company.15    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 16Opportunity.17    "Economic incentive" means all programs administered by, 18or for which an applicant for the program must seek 19certification, approval, or other action by, the Department, 20and all economic development programs, grants, or financial 21benefits administered by a political subdivision of the State.22    "Foreign country of concern" has the same meaning as in 23Section 5.24    "Government entity" means a State agency, a political 25subdivision of the State, or any other public or private   SB0048- 5 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1agency, person, partnership, corporation, or business entity 2acting on behalf of any public agency.3    "Prohibited entity" means an entity that is:4        (1) owned or controlled by the government of a foreign 5    country of concern; or6        (2) a partnership, association, corporation, 7    organization, or other combination of persons organized 8    under the laws of or having its principal place of 9    business in a foreign country of concern, or a subsidiary 10    of such an entity.11    (b) A government entity may not knowingly enter into an 12agreement or contract for an economic incentive with a 13prohibited entity.14    (c) Before providing any economic incentive, a government 15entity must require the recipient or applicant to provide the 16government entity with an affidavit signed under penalty of 17perjury attesting that the recipient or applicant is not a 18prohibited entity.19    (d) The Department shall adopt rules to administer this 20Section, including rules establishing the form for the 21affidavit required under subsection (c). 22    Section 15. Purchase of agricultural land by foreign 23principals prohibited.24    (a) As used in this Section:25    "Agricultural land" means any land located in this State   SB0048- 6 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1and used for agricultural, forestry, or timber production 2purposes.3    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture.4    "Foreign country of concern" has the same meaning as in 5Section 5.6    "Prohibited entity" means:7        (1) the government or any official of the government 8    of a foreign country of concern;9        (2) a political party or member of a political party 10    or any subdivision of a political party in a foreign 11    country of concern;12        (3) a partnership, association, corporation, 13    organization, or other combination of persons organized 14    under the laws of or having its principal place of 15    business in a foreign country of concern, or a subsidiary 16    of such entity;17        (4) any person who is domiciled in a foreign country 18    of concern and is not a citizen or lawful permanent 19    resident of the United States; or20        (5) any person, entity, or collection of persons or 21    entities, described in paragraphs (1) through (4) having a 22    controlling interest in a partnership, association, 23    corporation, organization, trust, or any other legal 24    entity or subsidiary formed for the purpose of owning real 25    property in this State.26    "Real property" means land, buildings, fixtures, and all   SB0048- 7 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1other improvements to land.2    (b) A prohibited entity may not directly or indirectly 3own, have a controlling interest in, or acquire by purchase, 4grant, devise, or descent agricultural land or any interest, 5except a de minimis indirect interest, in agricultural land in 6this State. A prohibited entity has a de minimis indirect 7interest if any ownership is the result of the entity's 8ownership of registered equities in a publicly traded company 9owning the land and if the entity's ownership interest in the 10company is either:11        (1) less than 5% of any class of registered equities 12    or less than 5% in the aggregate in multiple classes of 13    registered equities; or14        (2) a noncontrolling interest in an entity controlled 15    by a company that is both registered with the United 16    States Securities and Exchange Commission as an investment 17    adviser under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 and is 18    not a foreign entity.19    (c) A prohibited entity that directly or indirectly owns 20or acquires agricultural land in this State or any interest in 21agricultural land in this State before the effective date of 22this Act may continue to own or hold that land or interest but, 23except as provided in subsection (d), may not purchase or 24otherwise acquire by grant, devise, or descent any additional 25agricultural land in this State or any interest in 26agricultural land in this State on or after the effective date   SB0048- 8 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1of this Act.2    A prohibited entity that directly or indirectly owns or 3acquires agricultural land in this State or owns or acquires 4any interest in agricultural land in this State before the 5effective date of this Act must register with the Department 6within 6 months after the effective date of this Act. The 7Department must establish a form for those registrations that, 8at minimum, includes all of the following:9        (1) the name of the owner of the agricultural land or 10    the owner of the interest in that land;11        (2) the address of the agricultural land, the property 12    appraiser's parcel identification number, and the 13    property's legal description; and14        (3) the number of acres of the agricultural land.15    A prohibited entity that fails to timely file a 16registration with the Department is subject to a civil penalty 17of $1,000 for each day that the registration is late. The 18Department may place a lien against the unregistered 19agricultural land for the unpaid balance of any penalties 20assessed under this Section.21    (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, a 22prohibited entity may acquire agricultural land on or after 23the effective date of this Act by devise or descent, through 24the enforcement of security interests, or through the 25collection of debts, provided that the entity sells, 26transfers, or otherwise divests itself of the agricultural   SB0048- 9 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1land within 3 years after acquiring the agricultural land.2    (e) At the time of purchase, a buyer of agricultural land 3or an interest in agricultural land must provide an affidavit 4signed under penalty of perjury attesting that the buyer is:5        (1) not a prohibited entity; and6        (2) in compliance with the requirements of this 7    Section.8    (f) The failure to obtain or maintain the affidavit does 9not affect the title or insurability of the title for the 10agricultural land or subject the closing agent to civil or 11criminal liability, unless the closing agent has actual 12knowledge that the transaction will result in a violation of 13this Section.14    (g) The Department may initiate a civil action in the 15circuit court of the county in which the property is located 16for the forfeiture of the agricultural land or any interest in 17that land.18    (h) The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 19Section, including rules establishing the form for the 20affidavit required under subsection (e). 21    Section 20. Purchase of real property on or around 22military installations or critical infrastructure facilities 23by foreign principals prohibited.24    (a) As used in this Section:25    "Critical infrastructure facility" means any of the   SB0048- 10 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1following, if it employs measures such as fences, barriers, or 2guard posts that are designed to exclude unauthorized persons:3        (1) a chemical manufacturing facility;4        (2) a refinery;5        (3) an electrical power plant;6        (4) a water treatment facility or wastewater treatment 7    plant;8        (5) a liquid natural gas terminal;9        (6) a telecommunications central switching office;10        (7) a gas processing plant, including a plant used in 11    the processing, treatment, or fractionation of natural 12    gas; and13        (8) an airport.14    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 15Opportunity.16    "Foreign country of concern" has the same meaning as in 17Section 5.18    "Foreign principal" means:19        (1) the government or any official of the government 20    of a foreign country of concern;21        (2) a political party or member of a political party 22    or any subdivision of a political party in a foreign 23    country of concern;24        (3) a partnership, association, corporation, 25    organization, or other combination of persons organized 26    under the laws of or having its principal place of   SB0048- 11 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1    business in a foreign country of concern, or a subsidiary 2    of such entity;3        (4) any person who is domiciled in a foreign country 4    of concern and is not a citizen or lawful permanent 5    resident of the United States; or6        (5) any person, entity, or collection of persons or 7    entities, described in paragraphs (1) through (4) having a 8    controlling interest in a partnership, association, 9    corporation, organization, trust, or any other legal 10    entity or subsidiary formed for the purpose of owning real 11    property in this State.12    "Military installation" means a base, camp, post, station, 13yard, or center encompassing at least 10 contiguous acres that 14is under the jurisdiction of the Department of Defense or its 15affiliates.16    (b) A foreign principal may not directly or indirectly 17own, have a controlling interest in, or acquire by purchase, 18grant, devise, or descent any interest, except a de minimis 19indirect interest, in real property on or within 10 miles of 20any military installation in this State or critical 21infrastructure facility in this State. A foreign principal has 22a de minimis indirect interest if the ownership is the result 23of the foreign principal's ownership of registered equities in 24a publicly traded company owning the land and if the foreign 25principal's ownership interest in the company is either:26        (1) less than 5% of any class of registered equities   SB0048- 12 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1    or less than 5% in the aggregate in multiple classes of 2    registered equities; or3        (2) a noncontrolling interest in an entity controlled 4    by a company that is both registered with the United 5    States Securities and Exchange Commission as an investment 6    adviser under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 and is 7    not a foreign entity.8    (c) A foreign principal that directly or indirectly owns 9or acquires any interest in real property on or within 10 miles 10of any military installation or critical infrastructure 11facility in this State before the effective date of this Act 12may continue to own or hold that real property but, except as 13provided in subsections (e) and (f), may not purchase or 14otherwise acquire by grant, devise, or descent any additional 15real property on or within 10 miles of any military 16installation or critical infrastructure facility in this 17State.18    (d) A foreign principal must register with the Department 19if the foreign principal owns or acquires real property on or 20within 10 miles of any military installation or critical 21infrastructure facility in this State as authorized under 22subsection (e) or if the foreign principal owned or acquired 23an interest, other than a de minimis indirect interest, in 24that property before the effective date of this Act. The 25Department must establish a form for such registration which, 26at a minimum, includes the following:  SB0048- 13 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1        (1) the name of the owner of the real property; and2        (2) the address of the real property, the property 3    appraiser's parcel identification number, and the 4    property's legal description.5    A foreign principal that fails to timely file a 6registration with the Department is subject to a civil penalty 7of $1,000 for each day that the registration is late. A foreign 8principal must register a property interest owned before the 9effective date of this Act within 90 days after the effective 10date of this Act. A foreign principal who owns or acquires real 11property on or after the effective date of this Act must 12register the real property within 30 days after the property 13is owned or acquired. The Department may place a lien against 14the unregistered real property for the unpaid balance of any 15penalties assessed under this paragraph.16    (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, a 17foreign principal who is a natural person may purchase one 18residential real property that is up to 2 acres in size if all 19of the following apply:20        (1) the parcel is not on or within 5 miles of any 21    military installation in this State;22        (2) the person has a current verified United States 23    visa that is not limited to authorizing tourist-based 24    travel or official documentation confirming that the 25    person has been granted asylum in the United States, and 26    that visa or documentation authorizes the person to be   SB0048- 14 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1    legally present within this State; and2        (3) The purchase is in the name of the person who holds 3    the visa or official documentation described in paragraph 4    (2).5    (f) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, a 6foreign principal may acquire real property or any interest 7therein which is on or within 10 miles of any military 8installation or critical infrastructure facility in this State 9on or after the effective date of this Act, by devise or 10descent, through the enforcement of security interests, or 11through the collection of debts, provided that the foreign 12principal sells, transfers, or otherwise divests itself of 13such real property within 3 years after acquiring the real 14property.15    (g) At the time of purchase, a buyer of the real property 16that is on or within 10 miles of any military installation or 17critical infrastructure facility in this State must provide an 18affidavit signed under penalty of perjury attesting that the 19buyer is:20        (1) not a foreign principal or not a foreign principal 21    prohibited from purchasing the subject real property; and22        (2) in compliance with the requirements of this 23    Section.24    The failure to obtain or maintain the affidavit does not 25affect the title or insurability of the title for the real 26property or subject the closing agent to civil or criminal   SB0048- 15 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1liability, unless the closing agent has actual knowledge that 2the transaction will result in a violation of this Section.3    (h) The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 4Section, including rules establishing the form for the 5affidavit required under this Section.6    (i) The Department may initiate a civil action in the 7circuit court of the county in which the property is located 8for the forfeiture of the real property or any interest in the 9property. 10    Section 25. Purchase or acquisition of real property by 11the People's Republic of China prohibited. 12    (a) The following persons or entities may not directly or 13indirectly own, have a controlling interest in, or acquire by 14purchase, grant, devise, or descent any interest, except a de 15minimis indirect interest, in real property in this State:16        (1) The People's Republic of China, the Chinese 17    Communist Party, or any official or member of the People's 18    Republic of China or the Chinese Communist Party.19        (2) Any other political party or member of a political 20    party or a subdivision of a political party in the 21    People's Republic of China.22        (3) A partnership, an association, a corporation, an 23    organization, or any other combination of persons 24    organized under the laws of or having its principal place 25    of business in the People's Republic of China, or a   SB0048- 16 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1    subsidiary of one of those entities.2        (4) Any person who is domiciled in the People's 3    Republic of China and who is not a citizen or lawful 4    permanent resident of the United States.5        (5) Any person, entity, or collection of persons or 6    entities described in paragraphs (1) through (4) having a 7    controlling interest in a partnership, association, 8    corporation, organization, trust, or any other legal 9    entity or subsidiary formed for the purpose of owning real 10    property in this State.11    (b) A person or entity has a de minimis indirect interest 12if any ownership is the result of the person's or entity's 13ownership of registered equities in a publicly traded company 14owning the land and if the person's or entity's ownership 15interest in the company is either:16        (1) less than 5% of any class of registered equities 17    or less than 5% in the aggregate in multiple classes of 18    registered equities; or19        (2) a noncontrolling interest in an entity controlled 20    by a company that is both registered with the United 21    States Securities and Exchange Commission as an investment 22    adviser under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 and is 23    not a foreign entity.24    (c) A natural person described in subsection (a) may 25purchase one residential real property that is up to 2 acres in 26size if all of the following apply:  SB0048- 17 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1        (1) The parcel is not on or within 5 miles of any 2    military installation in this State.3        (2) The person has a current verified United States 4    visa that is not limited to authorizing tourist-based 5    travel or official documentation confirming that the 6    person has been granted asylum in the United States and 7    such visa or documentation authorizes the person to be 8    legally present within this State.9        (3) The purchase is in the name of the person who holds 10    the visa or official documentation described in paragraph 11    (2).12    (d) A person or entity described in subsection (a) that 13directly or indirectly owns or acquires any interest in real 14property in this State before the effective date of this Act 15may continue to own or hold such real property but, except as 16provided in subsection (g), may not purchase or otherwise 17acquire by grant, devise, or descent any additional real 18property in this State.19    (e) A person or entity described in subsection(a) must 20register with the Department if the person or entity owns or 21acquires more than a de minimis indirect interest in real 22property in this State. The Department must establish a form 23for such registration which, at a minimum, must include the 24following:25        (1) The name of the owner of the real property.26        (2) The address of the real property, the property   SB0048- 18 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1    appraiser's parcel identification number, and the 2    property's legal description.3    (f) A person or entity that fails to timely file a 4registration with the Department is subject to a civil penalty 5of $1,000 for each day that the registration is late. The 6Department may place a lien against the unregistered real 7property for the unpaid balance of any penalties assessed 8under this paragraph.9    (g) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person or an entity 10described in subsection (a) may acquire real property in this 11State on or after the effective date of this Act, by devise or 12descent, through the enforcement of security interests, or 13through the collection of debts, provided that the person or 14entity sells, transfers, or otherwise divests itself of that 15real property within 3 years after acquiring the real 16property.17    (h) At the time of purchase, a buyer of real property in 18this State must provide an affidavit signed under penalty of 19perjury attesting that the buyer is:20        (1) not a person or entity described in subsection (a) 21    or that the buyer is a person described in subsection (a) 22    but is authorized to purchase the subject property; and23        (2) in compliance with the requirements of this 24    Section.25    The failure to obtain or maintain the affidavit does not 26affect the title or insurability of the title for the real   SB0048- 19 -LRB104 03754 HLH 13778 b1property or subject the closing agent to civil or criminal 2liability, unless the closing agent has actual knowledge that 3the transaction will result in a violation of this Section.4    (i) If any real property is owned or acquired in violation 5of this Section, the real property may be forfeited to the 6State.7    (j) The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 8Section. 9    Section 900. The Property Owned By Noncitizens Act is 10amended by changing Section 7 as follows: 11    (765 ILCS 60/7)  (from Ch. 6, par. 7)12    Sec. 7. Real property held by noncitizens. Except as 13provided in the Foreign Countries of Concern Act, all All 14noncitizens may acquire, hold, and dispose of real and 15personal property in the same manner and to the same extent as 16natural born citizens of the United States, and the personal 17estate of a noncitizen dying intestate shall be distributed in 18the same manner as the estates of natural born citizens, and 19all persons interested in such estate shall be entitled to 20proper distributive shares thereof under the laws of this 21state, whether they are noncitizens or not.22    This amendatory Act of 1992 does not apply to the 23Agricultural Foreign Investment Disclosure Act.24(Source: P.A. 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22.)